Mississippi statutes. Title 57. Planning, Research and Development
Chapter 55. Universities Research Institutes

§ 57-55-1.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Universities Research Institutes Act of 1983.”

HISTORY:
Laws, 1983, ch. 512, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1983.

§ 57-55-3.
Legislative findings and declarations.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares:

That the economic and social progress of Mississippi depends in large measure upon the development, conservation and wise use of the natural resources of the state and orderly modernization of the laws of the state;

That organized research and planning in various institutions of higher learning of the state can make significant contributions to the progress of the state;

That the promotion of scientific and legal research, planning and development and the coordination of effort and dissemination of results among researchers and users is essential for efficient utilization of resources and orderly progress;

That this chapter is intended to promote, and implement specific research efforts at various universities and coordinate their efforts with related research and development work conducted by other governmental and private entities.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1983, ch. 512, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1983.

§ 57-55-5.
Mississippi Law Research Institute established; functions, powers and duties.

In order to promote the orderly modernization and simplification of the law of the state and more complete utilization of the law resources of this state, the Mississippi Law Research Institute, hereafter referred to as MLRI, is hereby established as an official advisory law revision, research and reform agency of the State of Mississippi under the management and control of the board of trustees of state institutions of higher learning as an academic department of the University of Mississippi Law Center.

The general purpose of the MLRI shall be to promote and encourage the clarification and simplification of the law of Mississippi, to improve the administration of justice, and to carry on scholarly legal research in anticipation of legal requirements for the efficient utilization and conservation of the natural resources of the state and the promotion of social, agricultural, industrial and commercial development. To that end it shall be the duty of said institute (a) to consider needed improvements in both substantive and adjective law and to make recommendations concerning same to the Legislature; (b) to examine and study the law of Mississippi and Mississippi jurisprudence with the object of discovering defects and inequities and of recommending needed reforms; (c) to receive and consider suggestions from judges, justices, public officials, lawyers and the public generally as to defects and anachronisms in the law; (d) to recommend from time to time such changes in the law as it deems necessary to reform or eliminate antiquated and inequitable rules of law and to bring the law of the state, both civil and criminal, into harmony with modern conditions; (e) to perform research and prepare reports on matters of law in support of the Legislature; (f) to advise and assist local governments, state agencies and associations by performing law research and preparation of related material, such as statutes and ordinances, reports, manuals, handbooks, codes, and conducting courses of instruction for the more efficient application of law and utilization of governmental resources; and (g) to prepare and publish texts and other scholarly works on law and procedure to aid in the administration of government within the state. In addition, the MLRI in cooperation with the Legislature and its staff shall devise and carry out a plan for continuous and comprehensive improvement in the utility and quality of the Mississippi Code. The MLRI shall coordinate its efforts with the work of the American Law Institute, National Conference of Commissioners on Uniform State Laws, the law and government institutes of the several states, and other such organizations in aid of the mission of said institute.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1983, ch. 512, §§ 3, 4, eff from and after July 1, 1983.

§ 57-55-7.
Mississippi Water Resources Research Institute established; functions, powers and duties.

The board of trustees of state institutions of higher learning is hereby authorized and directed to establish a Mississippi Water Resources Research Institute, hereinafter referred to as the WRRI, at Mississippi State University under the direct supervision of the president of the university or a vice-president to be designated by the president.

It shall be the function and duty of the WRRI to:

Assist state agencies in the development and maintenance of a state water management plan;

Consult with state and local governmental agencies, water management districts, water user associations, the legislature of the State of Mississippi, and other potential users in identifying and establishing research, planning, policy, and management priorities regarding water problems.

Negotiate and administer contracts with local, regional, state and federal agencies and other universities of the state for mitigation of priority water and related problems;

Report to the appropriate state agencies each year on the progress and findings of research projects;

Disseminate new information and facilitate transfer and application of new technologies as they are developed;

Provide for liaison between Mississippi and funding agencies as an advocate for Mississippi water research, planning, policy, and management needs; and

Facilitate and stimulate planning and management that:

Deals with water policy issues facing the State of Mississippi;

Supports state water agencies’ missions with research on problems encountered and expected;

Provides water planning and management organizations with tools to increase efficiency and effectiveness of water planning and management.

The principal administrative officer of the WRRI shall be a director, who shall be appointed by the president of Mississippi State University, with the approval of the board of trustees of state institutions of higher learning. To meet the purposes of the WRRI, the director shall develop appropriate policies and procedures (a) for identification of priority research problems; (b) for collaborating with local and state governmental agencies, water user associations, other universities, federal government agencies, and the legislature in the formulation of its research program; (c) for selection of projects to be funded; and (d) for the dissemination and transfer of information and technology produced by research.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1983, ch. 512, §§ 5-7, eff from and after July 1, 1983.

§ 57-55-9.
Mississippi Mineral Resources Institute established; functions and duties.

The Mississippi Mineral Resources Institute, hereinafter referred to as MMRI, is hereby established. The MMRI shall be under the management and control of the board of trustees of state institutions of higher learning. The principal offices of the MMRI shall be located at the University of Mississippi. The MMRI shall be organized to coordinate mining and mineral research, planning and development with the appropriate disciplines in other institutions of higher learning and other state, federal and private agencies concerned with the development and conservation of the mineral resources of the state.

It shall be the function and duties of the MMRI to:

Conduct basic and applied research for the development and conservation of mineral resources, including but not limited to mining, land reclamation and disposal of waste material;

Assist and support mining and mineral related research programs at the various institutions of higher learning;

Assist and consult with state and local agencies in planning the development and conservation of mineral resources;

Maintain liaison with private industry and appropriate state and local agencies to promote industrial development and conservation of mineral resources and plan, initiate and maintain a program of cooperative training between private industry and the academic and technical institutions of the state;

Disseminate new information and facilitate transfer and application of new technologies as they are developed; and

Negotiate and administer contracts with private, local, regional, state and federal agencies.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1983, ch. 512, §§ 8, 9, eff from and after July 1, 1983.

§ 57-55-11.
Mississippi Small Business Development Center Established; functions and duties.

The Mississippi Small Business Development Center, hereinafter referred to as SBDC, is hereby established. The board of trustees of state institutions of higher learning is hereby authorized to establish the Mississippi Small Business Development Center at the University of Mississippi under the direct supervision of the chancellor of the university and the dean of the business school.

It shall be the function and duty of the SBDC to:

Develop a system to deliver management assistance to the small business community utilizing the resources of local, state and federal government programs, various segments of the private sector, and universities and colleges throughout the state;

Make management and technical assistance available to small businesses in Mississippi by linking together the above resources;

Develop small business opportunities for new start-ups and the expansion of existing businesses;

Develop the economic area served by the SBDC by providing opportunities for increased productivity through utilization of modern technology as developed by government, the university and the private sector;

Develop a clearinghouse for the collection and dissemination of economic and business data;

Assist businesses in developing more efficient marketing and distribution channels, including foreign trade marketing;

Increase opportunities for socially and/or economically disadvantaged entrepreneurs to enter the mainstream of our economy through an organized outreach program; and

Increase small business viability so that the small business client “graduates” from the SBDC.

The principal officer of the SBDC shall be an executive director who shall be appointed by the chancellor of the University of Mississippi, with the approval of the board of trustees of state institutions of higher learning.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1983, ch. 512, §§ 10-12, eff from and after July 1, 1983.

§ 57-55-13.
Mississippi Polymer Institute established; functions and duties.

The Mississippi Polymer Institute, hereinafter referred to as the MPI, is hereby established under the management and control of the board of trustees of state institutions of higher learning. The principal offices of the MPI shall be located at the University of Southern Mississippi and shall be under the direction of the president and such other administrative authorities within the university as the board of trustees may determine.

It shall be the function of the MPI to conduct and sponsor research of interest to the polymer industries of the state, and to disseminate research results and other information of interest to appropriate individuals and research agencies for whom such knowledge will be helpful, and to the Mississippi polymer industries by conducting and sponsoring short courses, seminars and symposia. Said research shall be designed to increase the utilization of Mississippi raw materials in polymers and to support the rapidly growing polymer industry. Data from applications research will be released to appropriate Mississippi research agencies and industries for appropriate utilization. The MPI shall be organized to coordinate polymer research, planning and development with the appropriate disciplines in other institutions of higher learning and other state, federal and private agencies concerned with the development of Mississippi’s polymer industry.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1983, ch. 512, §§ 13, 14, eff from and after July 1, 1983.

§ 57-55-15.
Mississippi Energy Research Center established; functions and duties.

The Mississippi Energy Research Center, hereinafter referred to as the MERC, is hereby established under the management and control of the board of trustees of state institutions of higher learning. The MERC shall be a unit of Mississippi State University under the direct supervision of the president thereof or a vice president to be designated by the president.

It shall be the purpose of the MERC to develop, implement and coordinate energy and energy-related research programs in Mississippi. It shall be the duty of the MERC to:

Conduct basic and applied research related to energy needs within Mississippi;

Consult with state and local government agencies, utilities, industry and legislature and other potential users of research in identifying and prioritizing energy problems for research;

Negotiate and administer contracts with other universities of the state for the conduct of research projects;

Report to the Governor and to the Legislature each year on the progress and findings of research projects;

Facilitate the transfer and application of new technologies as they are developed; and

Facilitate and stimulate research that:

Deals with policy issues facing the Legislature;

Supports state agencies’ missions with research on problems encountered and expected; and

Provides energy planning and management organizations with tools to increase efficiency and effectiveness of energy planning and management.

The principal administrative officer of the MERC shall be a director, who shall be appointed by the president with the approval of the board of trustees of state institutions of higher learning. To meet the purposes of the center, the director shall develop appropriate policies and procedures (a) for identification of priority research problems; (b) for collaborating with local and state government agencies, utilities, industry, other universities, federal government agencies and the Legislature in the formulation of its research program; (c) for selection of projects to be funded; and (d) for the transfer of technology which is produced by the research.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1983, ch. 512, §§ 15-17, eff from and after July 1, 1983.

§ 57-55-17.
Mississippi Urban Research Center established; functions and duties.

The Mississippi Urban Research Center, hereinafter referred to as the MURC, is hereby established under the management and control of the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning. The principal officers of the MURC shall be located at Jackson State University and shall be under the direction of the president of the university subject to the governance of the board of trustees. The president shall appoint a director of the MURC who shall recommend to the president necessary professional and administrative staff of the center, all subject to the approval of the board of trustees.

It shall be the function of the urban research center to conduct basic and applied research into urban problems and public policy and to make available the results of this research to private groups, public bodies and public officials. They may offer consultations and general advisory services concerning urban problems and their solutions. According to the policies of the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning and with its approval, they may conduct instructional and training programs for those who are working in or expect to make careers in urban public service. Such training programs may be conducted by Jackson State University either in its own name or by agreement and cooperation with other public and private organizations. The MURC personnel shall cooperate fully with the various departments of the state government, with the colleges and universities of the state, with the University Research Center, with the Mississippi Department of Economic Development, and with other research and development agencies in an effort to fully effectuate the purpose of this section. All state agencies and departments are hereby authorized and directed to give the MURC and its personnel their full cooperation in every possible manner.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1983, ch. 512, §§ 18, 19; Laws, 1988, ch. 518, § 67, eff from and after July 1, 1988.

§ 57-55-19.
Provision of housing, equipment, personnel, etc.; acceptance of contributions, donations, gifts and grants.

The said board of trustees shall provide for such housing, equipment, personnel, supplies and services as it shall determine to be necessary for the proper operation and maintenance of the research institutions established by this chapter, having due regard for the contributory facilities and programs already existing at the various universities. In addition to appropriations made by the Mississippi legislature for the operation and support of the research institutions, the said board of trustees is authorized and empowered to receive contributions, donations, gifts and grants of money or other income and/or property, equipment, materials or manpower from persons, foundations, trust funds, corporations, organizations and other sources, to be expended by said board in carrying out the objectives of this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1983, ch. 512, § 20, eff from and after July 1, 1983.

§ 57-55-21.
Employment and compensation of personnel.

The said board of trustees may employ such full and part-time employees as is necessary to perform the duties of the institutions set forth above consistent with the availability of funds. Reasonable compensation and reimbursement of expenses may be made to such employees and others who provide professional services to the research institutions established by this chapter, including other employees of the State of Mississippi whose duties are increased by rendition of professional services to such institutions.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1983, ch. 512, § 21, eff from and after July 1, 1983.

§ 57-55-23.
Conduct of research for governmental entities, public or private organizations, etc., on contractual basis; use of proceeds.

The institutions established by this chapter may, subject to approval of the proper administrative authorities at the various universities, perform research and other services consistent with the purpose and duties of the institutes, on a contractual basis for governmental entities, public or private organizations, or any others, at a price and on a basis to be determined by such universities. The proceeds from such work shall be used, in addition to other funds provided therefor, for the operation and support of the research institutions.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1983, ch. 512, § 22, eff from and after July 1, 1983.